Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7963.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-6-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-6 entitled "Electricians" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
5-6-4. Board of examiners — Composition — Appointment of members — Policy-
making role.
(a)(1) There is created in the division of professional regulation, in the department of labor
and training, a state board of examiners of electricians that at all times consists of seven (7) eight
(8) qualified electors of the state as follows:
(i) A member of an electrical inspection department of any city or town with, at least, five
(5) years’ experience as an electrical inspector to represent the general public;
(ii) A qualified electrical contractor to represent employers;
(iii) A journeyperson electrician to represent labor;
(iv) The state fire marshal, who is ex officio, or his or her designee;
(v) A qualified employee of any electric utility company to represent the utility companies;
(vi) A journeyperson electrician to represent organized labor selected from a list of three
(3) persons submitted to the governor by the American Federation of Labor — Congress of
Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO); and
(vii) A member of the Rhode Island Sign Contractors Association.; and
(viii) A Rhode Island licensed telecommunications contractor.
(2) On or before January 31, the governor shall annually appoint a member or members of

the board to succeed the member or members whose term is at that time expiring who shall serve
for four (4) years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. Any vacancy that occurs in
the board from any cause shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) The board has a policy-making role in the preparation and composition of the
examinations to be administered by the division. Subsequent to the administration of the
examinations, the board of examiners shall review the examinations to evaluate their effectiveness.
The board shall supervise the operation of the division in an advisory capacity in promulgating any
policy that is necessary to improve the operation of the division in their area of expertise. The
promulgation of that policy is subject to the approval of the director of the department. Members
of the board are subject to the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36.
(c) The director of labor and training has the power to revoke or suspend the certificate or
license or impose a fine upon the certificate or license holder, for all certificates and licenses issued
by the division of professional regulation, after a hearing before and upon the recommendation of
the board of examiners of electricians.
SECTION 2. Section 5-70-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-70 entitled
"Telecommunications" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-70-4. Licensing authority.
(a) There is established a board of examination and licensing of telecommunications
systems contractors, technicians, and installers that shall be composed of seven (7) members. Five
(5) members of the board shall be telecommunications systems professionals who shall be qualified
for licensing under the provisions of this chapter. One of these members shall also hold, at the time
of appointment, an electrical contractor license, certificate A, issued by this state. Each of the four
(4) categories shall be represented by a minimum of one licensed professional within that category.
Each telecommunications professional member of the board shall be actively engaged in either/or
the design, installation, alteration, service, and testing of telecommunications systems, as defined
by this chapter, for ten (10) consecutive years immediately prior to appointment. One member of
the board shall be, at the time of appointment, an electrical inspector serving a city or town in this
state. One member of the board shall be, at the time of appointment, a designated representative of
the state building code commission who is knowledgeable in codes and regulations involving
telecommunications. Each member of the board shall be a qualified elector of the state for three (3)
consecutive years prior to appointment.
(b) Each member of the board shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate to serve for a term of five (5) years and until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. Not more than one member of the board shall be directly employed with or by any
LC005372 - Page 2 of 4

single business, firm, or corporation.
(c) Initial appointments to the board shall be made for one, two (2), three (3), four (4), five
(5), six (6), and seven (7) years in order to provide for the expiration of one position each year.
(d) Vacancies occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled by the governor with
the advice and consent of the senate for the unexpired portion of the term.
(e) Each member of the board shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required of state
officials generally.
The licensing authority charged with the examination and licensing of telecommunications
contractors, technicians, and installers shall be the state board of examiners of electricians as
established and described in § 5-6-4.
(b) All references to the licensing authority or “board” charged with the examination and
licensing of telecommunications contractors, technicians, and installers shall be deemed to be in
reference to the state board of examiners of electricians as established and described in § 5-6-4.
(c) All powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities previously assigned to the board of
examination and licensing of telecommunications systems contractors, technicians, and installers
are hereby transferred to the state board of examiners of electricians, and all regulatory authority
under this chapter shall be exercised by the director of the department of labor and training upon
the recommendation of the board.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005372
========
LC005372 - Page 3 of 4